Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1680.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The act of March 10, 1949 (P.L.30, No.14), known as the Public School Code of 1949, is amended by adding a section to read:Section 1529. Proposed Curriculum Changes; Online Curriculum Availability.--(a) All proposed curriculum changes in a school district shall be presented at a regular meeting of the board of school directors and may not be approved by the board of school directors until the next regular meeting.(b) Beginning with the 2026-2027 school year and each school year thereafter, a school entity shall post an Internet link or title for every primary resource used by the school entity, a 1234567891011121314151617181920 course syllabus or a written summary of each instructional course and the State academic standards for each instructional course offered by the school entity on the school entity's publicly accessible Internet website. The information shall be updated no later than thirty (30) business days after the list of primary resources, syllabi, course descriptions or State academic standards used by the school entity is revised.(c) The chief school administrator or a designee shall implement the requirements under subsection (b).(d) This section shall not be construed to require a school entity to violate the copyright, trademark or other intellectual property right of the creator or owner of the curriculum.(e) As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Chief school administrator." The superintendent of a school district, administrative director of an area career and technical school, executive director of an intermediate unit or a chief executive officer of a charter school, cyber charter school or regional charter school."Primary resource." A textbook, resource and online materials approved by the governing board of the school entity that are used as the base or primary source of instruction for the course and used consistently by a majority of students in the course."School entity." A school district, intermediate unit, area career and technical school, charter school, cyber charter school or regional charter school.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1680PN2056 - 2 - 1234567891011121314151617181920212223242526272829